Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5023.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 87.1
RARE DISEASE ADVISORY COUNCIL
23-87.1-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rare Disease Advisory Council."
23-87.1-2. Establishment.
(a) There is established in the department of health the rare disease advisory council.
(b) The purpose of the council is to provide guidance and recommendations to educate the
public, legislature, as well as other government agencies, on the needs of individuals with rare
diseases living in Rhode Island.
(c) The council shall conduct the following activities to benefit those impacted by rare
diseases in Rhode Island. The duties of the council shall include:
(1) Convene public hearings, make inquiries, and solicit comments from the general public
in Rhode Island to assist the council with a first-year landscape or survey of the needs of rare
disease patients, caregivers, and providers in the state.
(2) Provide testimony and comments on pending legislation and regulations before the
legislature and other state agencies that impact Rhode Island's rare disease community.
(3) Consult with experts on rare diseases to develop policy recommendations to improve

patient access to, and quality of, rare disease specialists, affordable and comprehensive health care
coverage, relevant diagnostics, timely treatment and other needed services.
(4) Research and make recommendations to state agencies and insurers that provide
services to persons with a rare disease on the impact of prior authorization, cost-sharing, tiering, or
other utilization management procedures on the provision of treatment and care for patients.
(5) Establish best practices and protocols to include in-state planning related to natural
disasters, public health emergencies or other emergency declarations to enable continuity of care
for rare disease patients and ensure safeguards against discrimination for rare disease patients are
in place.
(6) Evaluate and make recommendations to implement improvements to newborn infant
screening programs.
(7) Evaluate and make recommendations to improve Medicaid coverage of drugs for rare
disease patients, including engagement with the drug utilization review board, to improve coverage
of diagnostics, and facilitate access to necessary healthcare providers with expertise in the treatment
of rare diseases.
(8) Publish a list of existing, publicly accessible resources on research, diagnosis,
treatment, and education relating to the rare diseases on the council's website. For purposes of this
chapter, "rare disease" or "orphan disease" means a disease that affects fewer than two hundred
thousand (200,000) people in the United States.
(9) Identify areas of unmet need for research and opportunities for collaboration across
stakeholders that can inform future studies and reports by the council.
(10) Identify and distribute educational resources for health care providers to foster
recognition and optimize treatment of rare diseases.
(11) Research and identify best practices to reduce health disparities and achieve health
equity in the research, diagnosis and treatment of rare diseases.
(12) Research and identify best practices to ensure continuity of care for rare disease
patients transitioning from child/youth services to adult care.
23-87.1-3. Membership of council.
(a) All members of the council shall be full-time residents of Rhode Island and membership
shall include a diverse set of stakeholders.
(b) The governor shall appoint all members and shall designate a chair of the council within
thirty (30) days of enactment. The chair shall not hold any position within the government of Rhode
Island and shall serve for a term of three (3) years.
(c) The governor shall appoint the following members:
LC000507/SUB A/3 - Page 2 of 5

(1) One representative from academic research institutions in the state that receives any
grant funding for rare disease research;
(2) One representative from the Rhode Island department of health's office of minority
health;
(3) One representative from the Rhode Island Medicaid agency;
(4) One representative from the Rhode Island department of business regulation insurance
division;
(5) One registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed and practicing in
Rhode Island with experience treating rare diseases;
(6) One physician practicing in Rhode Island with experience treating rare diseases;
(7) One hospital administrator, or designee, from a hospital in Rhode Island that provides
care to persons diagnosed with a rare disease;
(8) At least two (2) patients who have a rare disease;
(9) At least one caregiver of a person with a rare disease;
(10) One representative of a rare disease patient organization that operates in Rhode Island;
(11) A pharmacist with experience dispensing drugs used to treat rare diseases;
(12) A representative of the biopharma industry;
(13) A representative of a health plan company; and
(14) A member of the scientific community who is engaged in rare disease research,
including, but not limited to, a medical researcher with experience conducting research on rare
diseases.
23-87.1-4. Terms and vacancies for council members.
(a) Term of members. Council members shall serve no longer than three (3) years, except
that, to facilitate a staggered rotation of members to retain continuity and knowledge transfer,
during the initial five (5) years after the establishment of the council, members may serve up to a
four (4) year term.
(b) Vacancy. If a vacancy occurs, the vacancy shall be filled in a like manner as required
pursuant to this section.
23-87.1-5. Reporting requirements.
(a) The council shall submit a report to the governor, the speaker of the house and the
president of the senate, and the chairs of the house and senate health and finance committees within
one year of enactment of the council and annually thereafter. Prior to submission, a draft of the
annual report shall be made available for public comment and discussed at an open public meeting.
(b) Annual reports shall:
LC000507/SUB A/3 - Page 3 of 5

(1) Describe the activities and progress of the council under this section; and
(2) Provide recommendations to the governor and legislature on ways to address the needs
of people living with rare diseases in the state.
23-87.1-6. Meeting requirements.
(a) Frequency.
(1) The initial meeting of the council shall occur within the first ninety (90) days after
enactment.
(2) During the first twelve (12) months after the initial meeting, the council shall meet each
month.
(3) Thereafter, the council shall meet once per quarter in person or via online meeting
platform as determined by the chair.
(b) Notice.
(1) The council shall, in compliance with chapter 46 of title 42 ("open meetings"):
(i) Provide opportunities for the public to hear updates and provide input into their work;
and
(ii) Create and maintain a public website where meeting minutes, notices of upcoming
meetings, and public comments can be submitted.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000507/SUB A/3
========
LC000507/SUB A/3 - Page 4 of 5